Illinois, session 104th, SB3056.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fire Investigation Act is amended by 5changing Section 6 as follows: 6    (425 ILCS 25/6)  (from Ch. 127 1/2, par. 6)7    Sec. 6. Investigation and record of fires; Office of the 8State Fire Marshal. 9    (a) The chief of the fire department shall investigate the 10cause, origin and circumstances of every fire occurring in a 11municipality or fire protection district, or in any area or on 12any property which is furnished fire protection by the fire 13department of such municipality or fire protection district, 14by which property has been destroyed or damaged, and shall 15especially make investigation as to whether such fire was the 16result of carelessness or design. Such investigation shall be 17begun within two days, not including Sunday, of the occurrence 18of such fire, and the Office shall have the right to supervise 19and direct such investigation whenever it deems it expedient 20or necessary. The officer making investigation of fires 21occurring in cities, villages, towns, fire protection 22districts or townships shall forthwith notify the Office and 23shall by the 15th of the month following the occurrence of the   SB3056- 2 -LRB104 18951 BDA 32396 b1fire, furnish to the Office a statement of all facts relating 2to the cause and origin of the fire, and such other information 3as may be called for in a format approved or on forms provided 4by the Office.5    (a-5) The Office shall investigate the cause, origin, and 6circumstance of a fire or an explosion in which fire is 7presumed to be a contributing factor in a death. Upon 8discovery of a fire-related death, the chief of the fire 9department or designee shall notify the Office for an 10investigation of the cause, origin, and circumstances. 11Notwithstanding the notification requirements in subsection 12(a), the chief of the fire department or designee shall 13maintain control of the scene until a representative of the 14Office arrives on the scene and initiates the investigation. 15This Section does not prohibit a fire department from 16conducting an investigation in conjunction with the Office.17    (b) In every case in which a fire is determined to be a 18contributing factor in a death, the coroner of the county 19where the death occurred shall report the death to the Office 20as provided in Section 3-3013 of the Counties Code. 21    (c) The Office shall keep a record of all fires occurring 22in the State, together with all facts, statistics and 23circumstances, including the origin of the fires, which may be 24determined by the investigations provided by this act; such 25record shall at all times be open to the public inspection, and 26such portions of it as the State Director of Insurance may deem   SB3056- 3 -LRB104 18951 BDA 32396 b1necessary shall be transcribed and forwarded to him within 2fifteen days from the first of January of each year. 3    (d) In addition to the reporting of fires, the chief of the 4fire department shall furnish to the Office such other 5information as the State Fire Marshal deems of importance to 6the fire services. 7(Source: P.A. 101-82, eff. 1-1-20.)